Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.248

[Art. 24] Summary courts-martial of organized militia not in federal service—Who may convene.

(1) In the organized militia not in federal service pursuant to Title 10 U.S.C., anyone authorized to convene a special court-martial, the commanding officer of a garrison, fort, post, camp, air base, auxiliary air base, or other place where troops are on duty, or of a regiment, wing, group, detached battalion, detached squadron, detached company, or other detachment may convene a summary court-martial consisting of one commissioned officer. The proceedings shall be informal.

(2) When only one commissioned officer is present with a command or detachment the commissioned officer shall be the summary court-martial of that command or detachment and shall hear and determine all summary court-martial cases brought before him or her. Summary courts-martial may, however, be convened in any case by superior competent authority when considered desirable.

[ 2009 c 378 s 14; 1989 c 48 s 24; 1963 c 220 s 26.]